dictionaries/so_SO/so_SO.dic
aabo/H
aadane/H
aakhiro/L
adeegso/O
af/K
agaasime/H
ahaan/T
akhlaaq/L
akhriso/N
akhriste/H
amni/G
aqal/K
aqoonsi/G
aqoon/T
aqoonyahan/K
aragti/L
Arbaco/L
ardayad/L
arday/G
arday/L
aroos/K
arrimo/hH
arrin/T
asal/K
asxaab/T
awood/L
Axad/L
baabuur/KT
baarlamaan/K
badbaaday/L
bakhaar/K
balli/G
banaan/K
Banadiri/G
bansiin/K
baqshad/L
bare/H
baro/M
barxad/L
beel/g
beero/hH
bil/g
bilow/G
bogso/O
booliis/K
boqor/K
Borofeysar/K
burbur/K
buste/H
caano/H
caay/L
cabe/H
caddad/K
caddayn/T
cadow/G
calan/K
caleen/T
calool/g
canjeero/L
carrab/K
carro/L
carruur/T
cay/L
ciidan/K
cirro/L
ciyaar/T
cod/K
codsi/G
codso/O
colaad/L
C/rixmaan
cudurdaaro/N
culays/K
cune/H
daahis/T
dadaal/KS
dad/K
dadweyne/H
dagaal/K
dal/K
danbeyn/T
darawal/K
darso/O
deegaan/K
degmo/L
degso/O
deked/L
deris/K
dhacdooyin/K
dhagayso/N
dhambaal/K
dhan/K
dhaqan/K
dhar/K
dhul/K
diin/T
dilal/K
diyaarad/L
dooli/G
dowlad/L
dugsi/G
duqeyn/T
duur/K
falal/K
fal/K
faragelin/T
fariiso/O
far/T
fayl/K
fikrad/L
fikrado/hH
fulin/T
gaashaan/K
gaashaanle/H
gabar/T
gacan/T
gacanyare/H
gade/H
garab/K
garo/N
garsoore/H
garsoor/K
garyare/H
geed/K
go'aan/K
golayaal/g
goob/T
goono/L
gube/H
gumeyste/H
guri/G
gurmad/K
guryo/hH
guul/g
guurso/O
habeen/K
habeyn/T
hab/K
hadaf/K
hal/K
hareer/H
har/T
hawl/g
hayso/M
heshiis/K
higgaad/L
hiiro/L
hooyo/L
hoteel/K
howl/g
hoy/G
hub/K
idaacad/H
ijaar/K
il/g
in/T
isbitaal/K
iskool/K
Isniin/T
jare/H
jiifo/N
jiir/K
jiiro/L
jilib/K
Jimco/L/h
jir/K
joogso/O
kaalin/T
khalad/K
Khamiis/T
khasaare/H
khiyaamo/L
khiyaar/K
koonfur/T
koox/HL
kor/K
kulan/K
kumbuyuutar/K
kursi/G
lacago/H
lacag/T
lafo/h
lug/T
luqad/L
maalgelin/T
maalin/HT
maamul/K
maareyn/T
Maay/G
macalin/K
macallin/K
macne/H
macsaro/L
macwiis/T
madaafiic/L
madal/g
madaxweyne/H
magaalo/L
malab/K
maqaal/K
maqaar/K
maslaxad/L
maxkamad/LL
meel/g
micne/H
miis/K
mindi/L
miro/h/H
moos/K
mudane/H
mustaqbal/K
naag/T
Nabi/G
naso/N
naxriiste/H
nidaam/K
niman/K
nin/K
nolol/g
noqo/R
odayaal/g
qaab/K
qaamuus/K
qabo/N
qalin/K
qaraabo/L
qarni/G
qasaaro/H
qaybo/H
qayb/T
qiime/H
qiyaas/T
qof/K
qoraal/K
qore/H
qoritaan/K
quuso/N
rabsho/L
rag/G
rayid/K
reer/K
run/T
Ruush/K
saabuun/T
sabab/T
sabiib/K
Sabti/G
safaarad/L
safiir/K
salaad/L
saldhig/G
saliid/L
sal/K
sanad/KH
san/K
sannad/H
saraakiil/g
sariir/T
sawir/K
sawiro/L
saxan/K
seexo/N
shaati/G
shacab/K
shaqeyso/M
sharaf/T
sharci/G
shimbir/T
shinni/L
shirar/K
shirkad/L
shirweyne/H
sigaar/K
sir/T
siyaasad/L/L
siyaasi/G
socdaal/K
socod/K
soco/R
sokor/T
sonkor/T
soor/T
su'aal/g
subag/G
surwaal/K
suul/K
Talaado/L
talis/K
tilmaame/H
tiro/L
todobaad/K
tole/H
toogo/N
ul/g
ulo/H
ummad/L
urur/K
waa/G
wade/H
wadne/H
wakhti/G
walaal/g
waqooyi/G
waqti/G
waraaqo/H
warar/K
warbixin/T
wareyso/N
wasiir/K
wasiiro/LL
waxyaabo/H
webi/G
weer/T
wiil/K
xaafad/LL
xaalad/L
xaaqin/K
xafiis/K
xaraf/K
xili/G
xil/K
xisbi/G
xoolo/H
xubno/H
xukun/K
